District of Columbia statutes.
28-3910

Investigatory powers of Corporation Counsel.

(a)

In the course of an investigation to determine whether to seek relief under section 28-3909, the Corporation Counsel may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine an individual under oath, and compel production of records, books, papers, contracts, and other documents. Information obtained under this section is not admissible in a later criminal proceeding against the person who provides the evidence.

(b)

A subpoena issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be issued in accordance with [§  1-301.89c].

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1402(f), 47 DCR 6308
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1036, 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 designated the existing text as (a); and added (b).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1402(f) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1402(f) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1036 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).